District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
42 act may be cited as the “Transparent Rates and Utility Expenses Amendment Act of 2026”.
1

43 Sec. 2. The Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-10; D.C.
44 Official Code § 42-3501.01 et seq.)) is amended as follows:
45 (a) Section 103 (D.C. Official Code § 42–3501.03) is amended by:
46 (1) A new paragraph (25B) is added to read as follows:
47 "(25B) "Ratio Utility Billing System" means a program that utilizes a
48 mathematical formula for allocating, among the tenants and property ownership in a residential
49 building, their share of the actual or anticipated water, sewer, electrical, oil, or natural gas
50 charges billed to the housing provider from a direct or third-party provider of any such utility
51 service. Permitted allocation methods may include formulas based on square footage, occupancy,
52 or number of bedrooms. A housing provider shall designate one allocation method per building,
53 and that method shall be applied uniformly to all tenants in the building, and disclosed to the
54 tenant prior to the time of application, and in the lease documents.".
55 (2) A new paragraph (37A) is added to read as follows:
56 "(37A) “Utility” includes:
57 “(A) Electricity usage;
58 “(B) Gas usage;
59 “(C) Wastewater and sewage disposal service usage; and
60 “(D) Water consumption or usage.”.
61 (b) Section 222 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3502.22) is amended as follows:
62 (1) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
63 (A) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
64 (i) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase "At the
65 time a prospective tenant files an application to lease any rental unit" and inserting the phrase
2

66 "Before requesting the application fee from a prospective tenant as part of tenant screening
67 pursuant to section 510(b)" in its place.
68 (ii) Subparagraph (A) is amended to read as follows:
69 “(A) An itemized list of all applicable charges for renting the rental unit,
70 and residing at the property, whether or not included in the rent, including a description of the
71 reason for each charge, whether the charge is optional or mandatory, and the applicable amount
72 at the outset of the tenancy, including:
73 “(i) The applicable rent for the rental unit;
74 “(ii) Any surcharge pursuant to sub-paragraph (C) of this
75 paragraph;
76 “(iii) Any pet fee;
77 “(iv) Any utility charge or fee pursuant to section 911(a); provided
78 that, if the charge may vary, the housing provider shall provide the method of calculation
79 pursuant to section 911(a)(1) and an itemized list of all utility charges or fees charged for the
80 rental unit during the previous 12 months.
81 "(v) Any other mandatory fee or charge above the rent that is the
82 responsibility of the tenant.
83 (iii) Subparagraph (K) is amended by striking the phrase “; and”
84 and inserting a semicolon in its place.
85 (iv) Subparagraph (L) is amended by striking the period and
86 inserting the phrase “; and” in its place.
87 (v) New subparagraphs (O) and (P) are added to read as follows:
3

88 “(O) For any utility for which the costs are billed to the tenant by the
89 housing provider:
90 “(i) A copy of the two most recent bills for the utility charged to
91 the housing provider by the utility provider;
92 “(ii) A complete description, presented in plain language, of the
93 method that the housing provider will use to allocate the charges for the utility to a tenant,
94 whether under a Ratio Utility Billing System formula or any other method of calculation. The
95 description shall include all inputs, rates, factors, denominators, or multipliers used in any
96 formula to calculate a tenant's individual monthly utility charge(s), along with a demonstrative
97 example that reflects realistic costs and inputs for the applicable unit or property.
98 "(P) A statement detailing the number of service disconnections by any
99 utility company or provider to the property in the previous 12 months.".
100 (B) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
101 (i) Subparagraph (D) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and
102 inserting a semicolon in its place.
103 (ii) Subparagraph (E) is amended by striking the period and
104 inserting the phrase “; and” in its place.
105 (iii) A new subparagraph (F) is added to read as follows:
106 “(F) For any utility for which the costs are billed to the tenant by the
107 housing provider, within 10 business days after written request by any tenant once every two
108 months, provide to the tenant without charge:
109 "(i) A copy of the utility provider’s bills to the housing provider
110 for the preceding 6 months; and
4

111 "(ii) An itemized list of all utility charges or fees charged for the
112 rental unit during the previous 12 months, including whether the charge is mandatory or optional.
113 (2) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
114 "(c) If the housing provider willfully violates any provision of this section or fails to
115 comply within 10 business days of written notice of any violation:
116 "(1) The rent for any rental unit shall not be increased; and
117 "(2) The utility charges or fees shall be unenforceable.".
118 (c) A new section 911 is added to read as follows:
119 “Sec. 911. Utility Billing Fairness.
120 “(a) Where the costs of any utility are billed to the tenant by the housing provider, the
121 lease shall include:
122 “(1) A complete description, presented in plain language, of the method that the
123 housing provider will use to allocate the charges for the utility to a tenant, whether under a Ratio
124 Utility Billing System formula or any other method of calculation. The description shall include
125 all inputs, rates, factors, denominators, or multipliers used in any formula to calculate a tenant's
126 individual monthly utility charge, along with a demonstrative example that reflects realistic costs
127 and inputs for the applicable unit or property;
128 “(2) The amount and purpose of any additional fees, service charges, or other
129 costs that the tenant must pay in connection with the utility or the operation of any billing system
130 for the utility; subject to the limitations of § 42-3505.10(b-2)(1).
131 “(3) An itemized list of all utility charges or fees charged for the rental unit during
132 the previous 12 months;
5

133 “(4) Where the housing provider employs a third-party billing company, its name
134 and contact information;
135 "(5) Where the housing provider employs a third-party billing company, a
136 statement that any disputes relating to the computation of the tenant's bill are between the tenant
137 and the landlord;
138 “(6) A statement of the tenant’s right to disclosure of utility billing information
139 under section 222(b)(1)(O) and section 222(b)(2)(F);
140 “(7) A statement that the tenant may inspect any water submetering equipment or
141 submeter usage records for the tenant’s unit, as provided in subsection (b) of this section.
142 “(b) Where a housing provider submeters a housing accommodation for the purpose of
143 billing tenants for water service, the housing provider shall permit a tenant to:
144 “(1) Inspect the submetering equipment for the tenant’s unit once per month. The
145 housing provider shall allow a tenant to use a third-party inspector for this inspection; and
146 “(2) Inspect the usage readings of the submetering equipment for that tenant’s
147 unit, for the entire time period that the tenant has occupied that unit.
148 “(c) Where a housing provider intends to newly impose a utility charge or change the
149 method of calculation for a utility charge during the tenancy, the housing provider shall not do so
150 unless and until the tenant has agreed to the new charge in writing.”.
151 (d) Section 501 is amended by adding an additional subparagraph (u) to read as follows:
152 "(u) No tenant shall be evicted for the nonpayment or the late payment of utilities, utility-
153 related charges, damages, or other fees if the tenant pays the full amount they owe or a court
154 finds they owe in utilities, utility-related charges, or other fees at any time before the United
155 States Marshals Service carries out an eviction. A housing provider may not file a claim under
6

156 this paragraph unless the amount owed in utilities, utility related charges, damages, or other fees
157 is at least $600, and may do so only after providing the tenant with a 10-day notice that includes
158 an itemized ledger and otherwise complies with the notice, service, and translation requirements
159 applicable to claims under this subsection and section (a) of this subchapter.".
160 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
161 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
162 impact statement required by 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
163 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
164 Sec. 5. Effective date.
165 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
166 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
167 provided in sections 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
168 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
169 Columbia Register.
7